src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON GALGGAT_IV !!= @CODE@ even-syllable modal verbs.
    +IV+Ind+Prs:%>        I-even-V           ;
    +IV+Ind+Prt:%>        II-even-V          ;
        +IV+Pot:%>Q1tj    I-odd-V            ;
        +IV+Inf:%>t       K                  ;
     +IV+PrfPrc:%>Y3m     K                  ;
  +IV+Actio+Nom:m         K                  ;
  +IV+Actio+Gen:ma        K                  ;
  +IV+Actio+Com:mijn      K                  ;
  +IV+Actio+Ess:min       K                  ;
  +IV+Actio+Ela:mis       K                  ;

 +IV+Ind+ConNeg:%>Q1      K                  ;
 +IV+Pot+ConNeg:%>Q1tja   K                  ;

       +IV+Cond:%>»Q2lulu V-ODD-PRET         ; ! gives galgaluluv osv is an old form that is seldom used today. it is not mentioned in other grammars than briefly in Spiik and more thoroughly in Grundström
   @C.NeedNoun@           GALGGAT_IV_flagged ;

LEXICON GALGGAT_IV_flagged
 +IV+Der3+Der/NomAct:»m    VSBST-ODD ;
  +IV+Der3+Der/mus+N:»muss MUS       ;

!!€gt-norm: soajttet # Eveb-syllable test
!!€ soajtáv:           soajttet+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1
!!€ soajttiv:          soajttet+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1
!!€ såjtijma:          soajttet+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1

LEXICON VIERTTIT_IV !!= @CODE@ Contracted modal verbs.
    +IV+Ind+Prs:%>      I-contr-V           ;
    +IV+Ind+Prt:%>      II-contr-V          ;
        +IV+Pot:%>tj    I-odd-V             ;
        +IV+Inf:%>t     K                   ;
     +IV+PrfPrc:%>m     K                   ;
  +IV+Actio+Nom:m       K                   ;
  +IV+Actio+Gen:ma      K                   ;
  +IV+Actio+Com:mijn    K                   ;
  +IV+Actio+Ess:min     K                   ;
  +IV+Actio+Ela:mis     K                   ;
 +IV+Ind+ConNeg:%>      K                   ;
 +IV+Pot+ConNeg:%>tja   K                   ;
       +IV+Cond:%>»lulu V-ODD-PRET          ; ! gives vierttiluluv osv is an old form that is seldom used today. it is not mentioned in other grammars than briefly in Spiik and more thoroughly in Grundström
   @C.NeedNoun@         VIERTTIT_IV_flagged ;

LEXICON VIERTTIT_IV_flagged
 +IV+Der3+Der/NomAct:»m    VSBST-ODD ;
  +IV+Der3+Der/mus+N:»muss MUS       ;

!!€gt-norm: hæhttut # Eveb-syllable test
!!€ hæhttut:           hæhttut+V+IV+Inf
!!€ hähttut:           hæhttut+V+IV+Inf
!!€ hæhttuv:           hæhttut+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1
!!€ hähttuv:           hæhttut+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1
!!€ hæhttujma:         hæhttut+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1
!!€ hähttujma:         hæhttut+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1

! This is for auxiliaries, they do not have passive.
! Thus, when passive is added, it will include BASSAT, but not GALGGAT


!! # Ordinary main verbs
! - - - - - - - - - -


!! ## Even-syllable stems
! -------------------
!!
!! Intransitives
!!

LEXICON GALSSJOT_IV !!= @CODE@ Impersonal o-verbs
          +IV:           DeverbalVerbsBIEGGAT ;
          +IV:%>         GALSSJOTinfl         ;
          +IV:           SG3PASSV             ;
         !+IV:            SG3PASSEVEN         ; outcommented to avoid short pass.
 +IV+Cond+Sg3:%>»Q1luluj K                    ; ! not sure if impersonal verbs even take conditionalis.


!!€gt-norm: hærmmot # Eveb-syllable test
!!€ hærmmu:           hærmmot+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3
!!€ härmmu:           hærmmot+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3
!!€ hærmoj:          hærmmot+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3
!!€ härmoj:          hærmmot+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3

LEXICON BÅRSSJOT_IV !!= @CODE@ o-verbs with
      +IV:%>        BÅRSSJOTStem        ;
      +IV:          DeverbalVerbsBASSAT ;
      +IV:          SG3PASSV            ;
     !+IV:            SG3PASSEVEN         ; no short pass here!
 +IV+Cond:%>»Q2lulu V-ODD-PRET          ; ! gives bårsjoluluv osv is an old form that is seldom used today. it is not mentioned in other grammars than briefly in Spiik and more thoroughly in Grundström


!!€gt-norm: hæssot # Eveb-syllable test
!!€ hæsov:           hæssot+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1
!!€ häsov:           hæssot+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1
!!€ hessuv:          hæssot+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1
!!€ hæsojma:          hæssot+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1
!!€ häsojma:          hæssot+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1

LEXICON VILSSJOT_IV !!= @CODE@ o-verbs as BÅRSSJOT but without derivations -stit, -stallat, -stahttet, - stasstet.  With dim -astit that are hardcoded
      +IV:%>        BÅRSSJOTStem        ;
      +IV:          DeverbalVerbsJUHKAT ;
      +IV:          SG3PASSV            ;
     !+IV:            SG3PASSEVEN         ; no short pass here!
 +IV+Cond:%>»Q2lulu V-ODD-PRET          ; ! gives vilsjoluluv osv is an old form that is seldom used today. it is not mentioned in other grammars than briefly in Spiik and more thoroughly in Grundström

!!€gt-norm: libjjot # Eveb-syllable test
!!€ libjov:           libjjot+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1
!!€ libjjuv:          libjjot+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1
!!€ libjojma:          libjjot+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1

LEXICON BUOLLET_IV  !!= @CODE@ e-verbs
       +IV:%>        RAVGGATStem          ;
       +IV:          DeverbalVerbsLÁHPPET ;
       +IV:          SG3PASSV             ;
!      +IV:          SG3PASSEVEN          ;
  +IV+Cond:%>»Q2lulu V-ODD-PRET           ; ! gives buoláluluv osv is an old form that is seldom used today. it is not mentioned in other grammars than briefly in Spiik and more thoroughly in Grundström



!!€gt-norm: liddet # Even-syllable test
!!€ littáv:           liddet+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1
!!€ liddiv:          liddet+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1
!!€ littijma:          liddet+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1

LEXICON BOAHTET_IV !!= @CODE@ e-verbs like BUOLLET_IV without passive
      +IV:%>        RAVGGATStem          ;
      +IV:          DeverbalVerbsLÁHPPET ;
 +IV+Cond:%>»Q2lulu V-ODD-PRET           ; ! gives boadáluluv osv is an old form that is seldom used today. it is not mentioned in other grammars than briefly in Spiik and more thoroughly in Grundström

!!€gt-norm: boahtet # Even-syllable test
!!€ boadáv:           boahtet+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1
!!€ båhtiv:          boahtet+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1
!!€ bådijma:          boahtet+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1

LEXICON VIEDJET_IV  !!= @CODE@ e-verbs GRADE II-I WITH IE DIPHT.
       +IV:%>        VIEDJETStem          ;
       +IV:          DeverbalVerbsLÁHPPET ;
       +IV:          SG3PASSV             ;
!      +IV:          SG3PASSEVEN          ;
  +IV+Cond:%>»Q2lulu V-ODD-PRET           ; ! gives væjáluluv osv is an old form that is seldom used today. it is not mentioned in other grammars than briefly in Spiik and more thoroughly in Grundström


!!€gt-norm: biehket # Eveb-syllable test
!!€ bægáv:           biehket+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1
!!€ bägáv:           biehket+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1
!!€ biehkiv:          biehket+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1
!!€ biegijma:          biehket+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1

LEXICON ASSTAT_IV  !!= @CODE@ only for asstat, no passive
      +IV:%>        ASSTATStem          ;
      +IV:          DeverbalVerbsBASSAT ;
 +IV+Cond:%>»Q2lulu V-ODD-PRET          ; ! gives astaluluv osv is an old form that is seldom used today. it is not mentioned in other grammars than briefly in Spiik and more thoroughly in Grundström


!!€gt-norm: asstat # Even-syllable test
!!€ astav:           asstat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1
!!€ asstiv:          asstat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1
!!€ astajma:          asstat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1

LEXICON RAVGGAT_IV  !!= @CODE@ a- and å-verbs only Sg3 passive.
       +IV:%>        RAVGGATStem         ;
       +IV:          DeverbalVerbsBASSAT ;
       +IV:          SG3PASSV            ;
!      +IV:          SG3PASSEVEN         ;
  +IV+Cond:%>»Q2lulu V-ODD-PRET          ; ! gives ravgaluluv osv is an old form that is seldom used today. it is not mentioned in other grammars than briefly in Spiik and more thoroughly in Grundström


!!€gt-norm: bajássjaddat # Even-syllable test
!!€ biváv         bivvat+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1
!!€ bivviv          bivvat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1
!!€ bivájma:          bivvat+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl1
