src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Verb
asstat+V:assta ASSTAT_IV ;
bahtet+V:bahte BUOLLET_IV ;
basstet+V:basste BUOLLET_IV ;
bessat+V:bessa RAVGGAT_IV ;
biehket+V:biehke VIEDJET_IV ;
bievkket+V:bievkke BUOLLET_IV ;
boahtet+V:boahte BOAHTET_IV ;
boajmmot+V:boajmmo BÅRSSJOT_IV ;
buollet+V:buolle BUOLLET_IV ;
buolljot+V:buolljo VILSSJOT_IV ;
buosskot+V:buossko VILSSJOT_IV ;
buovddat+V:buovdda RAVGGAT_IV ;
báhtset+V:báhtse BUOLLET_IV ;
bávkkot+V:bávkko BÅRSSJOT_IV ;
bårssjot+V:bårssjo VILSSJOT_IV ;
dibmat+V:dibma RAVGGAT_IV ;
divrrot+V:divrro BÅRSSJOT_IV ;
dulvvat+V:dulvva RAVGGAT_IV ;
dádjot+V:dádjo BÅRSSJOT_IV ;
dårbbåt+V:dårbbå RAVGGAT_IV ;
dæhppot+V:dæhppo BÅRSSJOT_IV ;
gabddet+V:gabdde BUOLLET_IV ;
galggat+V:galgga GALGGAT_IV ;
galmmet+V:galmme BUOLLET_IV ;
galssjot+V:galssjo GALSSJOT_IV ;
gevvat+V:gevva RAVGGAT_IV ;
gibttsot+V:gibttso BÅRSSJOT_IV ;
giejgget+V:giejgge BUOLLET_IV ;
gilldet+V:gillde BUOLLET_IV ;
gilljot+V:gilljo VILSSJOT_IV ;
gilppot+V:gilppo BÅRSSJOT_IV ;
goarŋŋot+V:goarŋŋo VILSSJOT_IV ; ! Goarŋastit?
goassot+V:goasso GALSSJOT_IV ;
guhkket+V:guhkke BUOLLET_IV ;
guhtsot+V:guhtso BÅRSSJOT_IV ;
guorbbat+V:guorbba RAVGGAT_IV ;
guovllot+V:guovllo BÅRSSJOT_IV ;
gåbddot+V:gåbddo BÅRSSJOT_IV ;
gåhtset+V:gåhtse BUOLLET_IV ;
gåjkkåt+V+Err/Orth:gåjggå RAVGGAT_IV ;
gævllot+V:gævllo BÅRSSJOT_IV ;
hiehpat+V:hiehpa RAVGGAT_IV ;
huvkket+V:huvkke BUOLLET_IV ;
håhpot+V:håhpo BÅRSSJOT_IV ;
hæhttut+V:hæhttu VIERTTIT_IV ;
hærmmot+V:hærmmo GALSSJOT_IV ;
iedjet+V:iedje VIEDJET_IV ;
ihtet+V:ihte BUOLLET_IV ;
jarrot+V:jarro BÅRSSJOT_IV ;
jehtsat+V:jehtsa RAVGGAT_IV ;
joavddet+V:joavdde BUOLLET_IV ;
juolggot+V:juolggo BÅRSSJOT_IV ;
jåhtet+V:jåhte BUOLLET_IV ;
jåvggåt+V:jåvggå RAVGGAT_IV ;
lavnnet+V:lavnne BUOLLET_IV ;
libjjot+V:libjjo VILSSJOT_IV ;
lienit+V:lieni VIERTTIT_IV ; ! Loan and not grade 3 !å lene?
lierkket+V:lierkke BUOLLET_IV ;
lievnnot+V:lievnno GALSSJOT_IV ;
lievvot+V:lievvo GALSSJOT_IV ;
lippsjot+V:lippsjo BÅRSSJOT_IV ;
lissjkot+V:lissjko VILSSJOT_IV ;
luobddet+V:luobdde BUOLLET_IV ;
luohkat+V:luohka RAVGGAT_IV ;
lássjmot+V:lássjmo BÅRSSJOT_IV ;
lávkkot+V:lávkko VILSSJOT_IV ;
låssjkåt+V+v2:slåssjkå RAVGGAT_IV ;
mieddet+V:miedde BUOLLET_IV ;
muhkot+V:muhko BÅRSSJOT_IV ;
murddet+V:murdde BUOLLET_IV ;
mássjat+V:mássja RAVGGAT_IV ;
nilljot+V:nilljo BÅRSSJOT_IV ;
njaddet+V:njadde BUOLLET_IV ;
njievkket+V:njievkke BUOLLET_IV ;
njuosskat+V:njuosska RAVGGAT_IV ;
njáhtsot+V:njáhtso GALSSJOT_IV ;
nuollot+V:nuollo BÅRSSJOT_IV ;
oavkket+V:oavkke BUOLLET_IV ;
rahkat+V:rahka RAVGGAT_IV ;
rihtjot+V:rihtjo BÅRSSJOT_IV ;
ruossat+V:ruossa RAVGGAT_IV ;
råsskot+V:råssko BÅRSSJOT_IV ;
rævggot+V:rævggo VILSSJOT_IV ;
sasskat+V:sasska RAVGGAT_IV ;
siepptet+V:sieppte BUOLLET_IV ;
sjebmat+V:sjebma RAVGGAT_IV ;
sjlissjkot+V:sjlissjko VILSSJOT_IV ;
sjuodnjot+V:sjuodnjo BÅRSSJOT_IV ;
sjuohkket+V:sjuohkke BUOLLET_IV ;
sjuohtsat+V:sjuohtsa RAVGGAT_IV ;
skoalkkat+V:skoalkka RAVGGAT_IV ;
skælbbot+V:skælbbo BÅRSSJOT_IV ;
slissjkot+V:slissjko VILSSJOT_IV ; ! See lissjkot 
sloahkkat+V:sloahkka RAVGGAT_IV ;
snjarvvat+v2+V:sjnjarvva RAVGGAT_IV ;
snjipptjot+v2+V:sjnjipptjo BÅRSSJOT_IV ; ! See snjibttjot 
snjulltjot+v1+V:snjulltjo VILSSJOT_IV ;
snjulltjot+v2+V:sjnjulltjo VILSSJOT_IV ;
snjåhpat+v2+V:sjnjåhpa RAVGGAT_IV ;
snurkket+V:snurkke BUOLLET_IV ;
soajttet+V:soajtte GALGGAT_IV ;
stussjkat+V:stussjka RAVGGAT_IV ;
stávttjot+V:stávttjo BÅRSSJOT_IV ;
sálltot+V:sállto BÅRSSJOT_IV ;
sågŋåt+V:sågŋå RAVGGAT_IV ;
tjilvvot+V:tjilvvo BÅRSSJOT_IV ;
tjuodtjot+V+Err/Orth:tjuodjot VILSSJOT_IV ;
tjuodtjot+V:tjuodtjo VILSSJOT_IV ;
tjuornnat+V:tjuornna RAVGGAT_IV ;
tjádet+V:tjáde BUOLLET_IV ;
tjárrot+V:tjárro BÅRSSJOT_IV ;
tjællot+V:tjællo VILSSJOT_IV ;
tsihpat+V:tsihpa RAVGGAT_IV ;
tsirggot+V:tsirggo VILSSJOT_IV ;
tsivkket+V:tsivkke BUOLLET_IV ;
tsuodtsot+V:tsuodtso VILSSJOT_IV ;
tsævvot+V:tsævvo GALSSJOT_IV ;
ulljot+V:ulljo GALSSJOT_IV ;
vahtjot+V:vahtjo GALSSJOT_IV ;
viedjet+V:viedje VIEDJET_IV ;
vielldet+V:viellde BUOLLET_IV ;
vierrat+V:vierra RAVGGAT_IV ;
vierttit+V+Err/Orth:vierddi VIERTTIT_IV ; !Added because of many typos
vierttit+V+Err/Orth:vierrti VIERTTIT_IV ;
vierttit+V:viertti VIERTTIT_IV ;
viessot+V:viesso BÅRSSJOT_IV ;
vilssjot+V:vilssjo VILSSJOT_IV ;
vuodtjot+V:vuodtjo GALSSJOT_IV ;
álbbot+V:álbbo BÅRSSJOT_IV ;
álgget+V:álgge BUOLLET_IV ;
ælljat+V:ællja RAVGGAT_IV ;
